Missouri, session 2026, HB2085.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 407.932, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 407.932, to read as follows:
407.932. [Nothing in sections 407.925 to 407.932 shall prohibit local political
subdivisions from enacting more stringent ordinances or rules. ] 1. The state preempts the
field of regulating the sale of tobacco products, the sale of alternative nicotine products,
and the sale of vapor products including, but not limited to, local ordinances dealing
with ingredients, setting the age to sell or purchase over twenty-one years of age,
licensing bans, and product bans, and the provisions of sections 407.924 to 407.934 shall
supersede any local laws, ordinances, orders, rules, or regulations enacted by a county,
municipality, or other political subdivision to regulate the sale of tobacco products,
alternative nicotine products, or vapor products.
2. This section shall not prohibit counties, municipalities, or other political
subdivisions from enforcing ordinances or regulations that set the age to sell or purchase
tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, and vapor products to individuals
under twenty-one years of age.
3. This section shall not apply to any local laws, ordinances, orders, rules, or
regulations enacted by a county, municipality, or other political subdivision prior to
January 1, 2026.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.